North Dakota statutes. TITLE 23 Health and Safety
CHAPTER 23-07 Reportable Diseases
23-07-15.
Removal of individual with reportable disease or condition — Removal of body of individual who died of reportable disease or condition — Prohibited — Declaration of emergency or disaster — Rulemaking authority.
[Effective through August 31, 2022]

Unless the person has a permit from the local board of health or state department of health, a person may not remove or cause to be removed from without this state into this state, from one building to another within this state, or from or to any railroad car or motor vehicle, an individual with a reportable disease or condition, or the body of an individual who died of a reportable disease or condition.

If the governor declares an emergency or a disaster based on an epidemic under chapter 37-17.1, the health council shall consider whether to adopt rules or emergency rules directing the state department of health to notify emergency medical services personnel of the presence of a reportable disease or condition and any person taking possession of a dead body of a post-mortem communicable disease. Notwithstanding state laws to the contrary, rules adopted under this section may provide for the disclosure of personally identifiable information.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 90, § 12; R.C. 1895, § 266; R.C. 1899, § 266; R.C. 1905, § 278; C.L. 1913, § 424; R.C. 1943, § 23-0715; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 197, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 23-07-15 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 182 of Chapter 352, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1247; and Section 2 of Chapter 197, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1219.

Cross-References.

Board of embalmers to adopt rules for disinfection of deceased person to prevent spread of contagious diseases, see N.D.C.C. § 43-10-16.

23-07-15.
Removal of individual with reportable disease or condition — Removal of body of individual who died of reportable disease or condition — Prohibited — Declaration of emergency or disaster — Rulemaking authority.
[Effective September 1, 2022]

Unless the person has a permit from the local board of health or department of health and human services, a person may not remove or cause to be removed from without this state into this state, from one building to another within this state, or from or to any railroad car or motor vehicle, an individual with a reportable disease or condition, or the body of an individual who died of a reportable disease or condition.

If the governor declares an emergency or a disaster based on an epidemic under chapter 37-17.1, the health council shall consider whether to adopt rules or emergency rules directing the department of health and human services to notify emergency medical services personnel of the presence of a reportable disease or condition and any person taking possession of a dead body of a post-mortem communicable disease. Notwithstanding state laws to the contrary, rules adopted under this section may provide for the disclosure of personally identifiable information.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 90, § 12; R.C. 1895, § 266; R.C. 1899, § 266; R.C. 1905, § 278; C.L. 1913, § 424; R.C. 1943, § 23-0715; S.L. 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 197, § 2, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 352, § 182, effective September 1, 2022.

23-07-16.
Child having contagious or infectious disease prohibited from attending school — Exception.

Except as provided by section 23-07-16.1, no principal, superintendent, or teacher of any school, and no parent or guardian of any minor child, may permit any child having any significant contagious or infectious disease, or any child residing in any house in which any such disease exists or has recently existed, to attend any public or private school until permitted to do so under the regulations of the local board of health.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 90, § 14; R.C. 1895, § 268; R.C. 1899, § 268; R.C. 1905, § 280; C.L. 1913, § 426; R.C. 1943, § 23-0716; S.L. 1989, ch. 311, § 1.

23-07-16.1.
School district to adopt policy relating to significant contagious diseases.

Each school district shall adopt a policy governing the disposition of children attending school within the school district, employees of the school district, or independent contractors under contract with the school district who are diagnosed as having a significant contagious disease. The state department of health shall, with advice from the superintendent of public instruction, adopt rules establishing guidelines for the policy. The guidelines may include methods and procedures relating to a determination of whether and under what conditions a child with a significant contagious disease may not continue attending school or whether and under what conditions an employee or an independent contractor with a significant contagious disease may not continue in a work assignment.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 311, § 2; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

23-07-17.
Vaccination or inoculation not required for admission to any school or for the exercise of a right. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 224, § 2.

23-07-17.1.
Inoculation required before admission to school. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

A child may not be admitted to any public, private, or parochial school, or day care center, child care facility, head start program, or nursery school operating in this state or be supervised through home-based instruction unless the child’s parent or guardian presents to the institution authorities a certification from a licensed physician or authorized representative of the state department of health that the child has received age-appropriate immunization against diphtheria, pertussis, tetanus, measles, rubella (German measles), mumps, hepatitis B, haemophilus influenza type b (Hib), varicella (chickenpox), poliomyelitis, pneumococcal disease, meningococcal disease, rotovirus, and hepatitis A. In the case of a child receiving home-based instruction, the child’s parent or legal guardian shall file the certification with the public school district in which the child resides.

A child may enter an institution upon submitting written proof from a licensed physician or authorized representative of the state department of health stating that the child has started receiving the required immunization or has a written consent by the child’s parent or guardian for a local health service or department to administer the needed immunization without charge or has complied with the requirements for certificate of exemption as provided for in subsection 3.

Any minor child, through the child’s parent or guardian, may submit to the institution authorities either a certificate from a licensed physician stating that the physical condition of the child is such that immunization would endanger the life or health of the child or a certificate signed by the child’s parent or guardian whose religious, philosophical, or moral beliefs are opposed to such immunization. The minor child is then exempt from the provisions of this section.

The enforcement of subsections 1, 2, and 3 is the responsibility of the designated institution authority.

The immunizations required, and the procedure for their administration, as prescribed by the state department of health, must conform to recognized standard medical practices in the state. The state department of health shall administer the provisions of this section and shall promulgate rules and regulations in the manner prescribed by chapter 28-32 for the purpose of administering this section.

When, in the opinion of the health officer, danger of an epidemic exists from any of the communicable diseases for which immunization is required under this section, the exemptions from immunization against such disease may not be recognized and children not immunized must be excluded from an institution listed in subsection 1 until, in the opinion of the health officer, the danger of the epidemic is over. The designated institution authority shall notify those parents or guardians taking legal exception to the immunization requirements that their children are excluded from school during an epidemic as determined by the state department of health.

When, in the opinion of the health officer, extenuating circumstances make it difficult or impossible to comply with immunization requirements, the health officer may authorize children who are not immunized to be admitted to an institution listed in subsection 1 until the health officer determines that the extenuating circumstances no longer exist. Extenuating circumstances include a shortage of vaccine and other temporary circumstances.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 224, § 1; 1979, ch. 314, § 1; 1993, ch. 253, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1999, ch. 234, § 1; 1999, ch. 235, § 1; 2003, ch. 212, § 1; 2007, ch. 238, §§ 1, 2.

23-07-17.1.
Inoculation required before admission to school. [Effective September 1, 2022]

A child may not be admitted to any public, private, or parochial school, or day care center, child care facility, head start program, or nursery school operating in this state or be supervised through home-based instruction unless the child’s parent or guardian presents to the institution authorities a certification from a licensed physician or authorized representative of the department of health and human services that the child has received age-appropriate immunization against diphtheria, pertussis, tetanus, measles, rubella (German measles), mumps, hepatitis B, haemophilus influenza type b (Hib), varicella (chickenpox), poliomyelitis, pneumococcal disease, meningococcal disease, rotovirus, and hepatitis A. In the case of a child receiving home-based instruction, the child’s parent or legal guardian shall file the certification with the public school district in which the child resides.

A child may enter an institution upon submitting written proof from a licensed physician or authorized representative of the department of health and human services stating that the child has started receiving the required immunization or has a written consent by the child’s parent or guardian for a local health service or department to administer the needed immunization without charge or has complied with the requirements for certificate of exemption as provided for in subsection 3.

Any minor child, through the child’s parent or guardian, may submit to the institution authorities either a certificate from a licensed physician stating that the physical condition of the child is such that immunization would endanger the life or health of the child or a certificate signed by the child’s parent or guardian whose religious, philosophical, or moral beliefs are opposed to such immunization. The minor child is then exempt from the provisions of this section.

The enforcement of subsections 1, 2, and 3 is the responsibility of the designated institution authority.

The immunizations required, and the procedure for their administration, as prescribed by the department of health and human services, must conform to recognized standard medical practices in the state. The department of health and human services shall administer the provisions of this section and shall promulgate rules and regulations in the manner prescribed by chapter 28-32 for the purpose of administering this section.

When, in the opinion of the health officer, danger of an epidemic exists from any of the communicable diseases for which immunization is required under this section, the exemptions from immunization against such disease may not be recognized and children not immunized must be excluded from an institution listed in subsection 1 until, in the opinion of the health officer, the danger of the epidemic is over. The designated institution authority shall notify those parents or guardians taking legal exception to the immunization requirements that their children are excluded from school during an epidemic as determined by the department of health and human services.

When, in the opinion of the health officer, extenuating circumstances make it difficult or impossible to comply with immunization requirements, the health officer may authorize children who are not immunized to be admitted to an institution listed in subsection 1 until the health officer determines that the extenuating circumstances no longer exist. Extenuating circumstances include a shortage of vaccine and other temporary circumstances.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 224, § 1; 1979, ch. 314, § 1; 1993, ch. 253, § 1; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 1999, ch. 234, § 1; 1999, ch. 235, § 1; 2003, ch. 212, § 1; 2007, ch. 238, §§ 1, 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 183, effective September 1, 2022.

23-07-18.
Physician to report death from contagious or infectious disease to local board of health.

Each practicing physician in this state shall report to the local board of health within the jurisdiction of which the death occurred, in writing, the death of any of the physician’s patients who has died of any contagious or infectious disease. The report must be made within twenty-four hours after such death and must state the specific name and character of the disease.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 90, § 9; R.C. 1895, § 264; R.C. 1899, § 264; R.C. 1905, § 276; C.L. 1913, § 422; R.C. 1943, § 23-0718.

23-07-19.
Appropriation made on report showing action necessary to prevent spread of tuberculosis.

If any society or association organized and existing for the purpose of controlling the spread of tuberculosis in this state considers it necessary to secure the services of a visiting nurse or nurses, or to disinfect any building, room, residence, hotel, or other place infected with tuberculosis, the society shall report such fact to the president of the county board of health and to the board of county commissioners. The report must recommend the course of action advisable to be adopted by the board of county commissioners in relation thereto and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, and such board, at its next meeting, shall consider such report and recommendation and act on the same. The board may audit and allow bills for services rendered in carrying into effect any action taken by it under the provisions of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 124, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 2266; R.C. 1943, § 23-0719.

Cross-References.

Tuberculosis treatment, see N.D.C.C. ch. 23-07.1.

23-07-20.
Board of county commissioners may appropriate money to prevent the spread of tuberculosis.

The board of county commissioners of any county in this state may appropriate county money and levy taxes within the county levy limitations for the purpose of paying for the services of visiting nurses or other necessary medical attention or advice in preventing the spread of tuberculosis in the county, or for the purpose of disinfecting any building, room, residence, hotel, or other place in such county infected with tuberculosis, and may cooperate with neighboring counties to establish homes or hospitals for incurable tuberculosis patients.

Source:

S.L. 1913, ch. 124, §§ 2, 3; C.L. 1913, §§ 2267, 2268; R.C. 1943, § 23-0720.

23-07-20.1.
Disclosure of records.

To protect the integrity of disease control records, to ensure their proper use, and to ensure efficient and proper administration of the department’s disease control function, it is unlawful for any person to permit inspection of or to disclose information contained in disease control records, including results of laboratory tests, or to copy or issue a copy of all or part of any such record except as authorized by rules.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 312, § 1.

23-07-21.
Penalties. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person is guilty of an infraction:

Who violates or fails to obey any provision of this chapter, any lawful rule made by the state department of health, or any order issued by any state, district, county, or municipal health officer;

Who violates any quarantine law or regulation, or who leaves a quarantined area without being discharged; or

Who, knowing that the person is infected with a sexually transmitted disease, willfully exposes another person to infection.

Any person required to make a report under section 23-07-02.1 who releases or makes public confidential information or otherwise breaches the confidentiality requirements of section 23-07-02.2 is guilty of a class C felony.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, §§ 440, 470; R.C. 1895, §§ 7296, 7326; R.C. 1899, §§ 7296, 7326; R.C. 1905, §§ 9036, 9067; C.L. 1913, §§ 9752, 9786; S.L. 1919, ch. 237, §§ 1, 6; 1925 Supp., §§ 2971b1, 2971b6; R.C. 1943, § 23-0721; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 239; 1989, ch. 181, § 11; 1989, ch. 310, § 4; 1995, ch. 243, § 2.

Cross-References.

City health officer to keep records of cases of reportable diseases, see N.D.C.C. § 23-07-05.

Penalty for class C felony, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

Collateral References.

Tort liability for infliction of venereal disease, 40 A.L.R.4th 1089.

23-07-21.
Penalties. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person is guilty of an infraction:

Who violates or fails to obey any provision of this chapter, any lawful rule made by the department of health and human services, or any order issued by any state, district, county, or municipal health officer;

Who violates any quarantine law or regulation, or who leaves a quarantined area without being discharged; or

Who, knowing that the person is infected with a sexually transmitted disease, willfully exposes another person to infection.

Any person required to make a report under section 23-07-02.1 who releases or makes public confidential information or otherwise breaches the confidentiality requirements of section 23-07-02.2 is guilty of a class C felony.

Source:

Pen. C. 1877, §§ 440, 470; R.C. 1895, §§ 7296, 7326; R.C. 1899, §§ 7296, 7326; R.C. 1905, §§ 9036, 9067; C.L. 1913, §§ 9752, 9786; S.L. 1919, ch. 237, §§ 1, 6; 1925 Supp., §§ 2971b1, 2971b6; R.C. 1943, § 23-0721; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 239; 1989, ch. 181, § 11; 1989, ch. 310, § 4; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2021, ch. 352, § 184, effective September 1, 2022.